Illinois, session 104th, HB2.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Sections 24-1.1, 24A-3, and 24B-3 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/24-1.1)  (from Ch. 46, par. 24-1.1)7    Sec. 24-1.1. The county board of each county having a 8population of 35,000 or more, with respect to all elections 9for which the county board or the county clerk is charged with 10the duty of providing materials and supplies, and each board 11of election commissioners in a municipality having a 12population of 35,000 or more with respect to elections under 13its jurisdiction, must provide either voting machines in 14accordance with this Article or electronic voting systems in 15accordance with Article 24A for each precinct for all such 16elections except as provided in Section 24-1.2 except in 17elections held pursuant to the provisions of Section 12 of 18Article VI of the Constitution relating to retention of judges 19in office, in which event, the special ballot containing the 20propositions on the retention of judges may be placed on the 21voting machines or devices. For purposes of this Section 2224-1.1, the term "population" does not include persons 23prohibited from voting by Section 3-5 of this Act.  HB0002- 2 -LRB104 03384 SPS 13406 b1    Before voting machines or electronic voting systems are 2introduced, adopted or used in any precinct or territory at 3least 2 months public notice must be given before the date of 4the first election wherein such machines are to be used. The 5election authority shall publish the notice at least once in 6one or more newspapers published within its jurisdiction in 7which the election is held. If there is no such newspaper, the 8notice shall be published in a newspaper published in the 9county and having a general circulation within such political 10subdivision of this State. The notice shall be substantially 11as follows:12    Notice is hereby given that on (give date), at (give place 13where election is held) in the county of .... an election will 14be held for (give name of office to be filled) at which voting 15machines will be used.16    Dated at .... on (insert date).  17    The notice referred to herein shall be given only at the 18first election at which such voting machines or electronic 19voting systems are used.20(Source: P.A. 91-357, eff. 7-29-99.) 21    (10 ILCS 5/24A-3)  (from Ch. 46, par. 24A-3)22    Sec. 24A-3. Except as otherwise provided in this Section, 23any county board, board of county commissioners and any board 24of election commissioners, with respect to territory within   HB0002- 3 -LRB104 03384 SPS 13406 b1its jurisdiction, may adopt, experiment with, or abandon a 2voting system approved for use by the State Board of Elections 3and may use such voting system in all or some of the precincts 4within its jurisdiction, or in combination with paper ballots 5or voting machines. Any such county board, board of county 6commissioners or board of election commissioners may contract 7for the tabulation of votes at a location outside its 8territorial jurisdiction when there is no suitable tabulating 9equipment available within its territorial jurisdiction. In no 10case may a county board, board of county commissioners or 11board of election commissioners contract or arrange for the 12purchase, lease or loan of an electronic voting system or 13voting system component without the approval of the State 14Board of Elections as provided by Section 24A-16. However, the 15county board and board of county commissioners of each county 16having a population of 40,000 or more, with respect to all 17elections for which the county board or the county clerk is 18charged with the duty of providing materials and supplies, and 19each board of election commissioners in a municipality having 20a population of 40,000 or more, with respect to elections 21under its jurisdiction, must provide either voting systems 22approved for use by the State Board of Elections under this 23Article or voting machines under Article 24 for each precinct 24for all such elections except as provided in Section 24-1.2. 25For purposes of this Section 24A-3, the term "population" does 26not include persons prohibited from voting by Section 3-5 of   HB0002- 4 -LRB104 03384 SPS 13406 b1this Act.2    Before any such system is introduced, adopted or used in 3any precinct or territory at least 2 months public notice must 4be given before the date of the first election wherein such 5voting system is to be used. The election authority shall 6publish the notice at least once in one or more newspapers 7published within the county, or other jurisdiction, as the 8case may be, in which the election is held. If there is no such 9newspaper, the notice shall be published in a newspaper 10published in the county and having a general circulation 11within such jurisdiction. The notice shall be substantially as 12follows:13    Notice is hereby given that on (give date), at (give place 14where election is held) in the county of ...., an election will 15be held for (give name of offices to be filled) at which an 16electronic voting system will be used.17    Dated at .... on (insert date).  18    The notice referred to herein shall be given only at the 19first election at which such voting machines or voting systems 20are used.21(Source: P.A. 91-357, eff. 7-29-99.) 22    (10 ILCS 5/24B-3)23    Sec. 24B-3. Adoption, experimentation or abandonment of 24Precinct Tabulation Optical Scan Technology system; Boundaries   HB0002- 5 -LRB104 03384 SPS 13406 b1of precincts; Notice. Except as otherwise provided in this 2Section, any county board, board of county commissioners and 3any board of election commissioners, with respect to territory 4within its jurisdiction, may adopt, experiment with, or 5abandon a Precinct Tabulation Optical Scan Technology voting 6system approved for use by the State Board of Elections and may 7use the Precinct Tabulation Optical Scan Technology voting 8system in all or some of the precincts within its 9jurisdiction, or in combination with paper ballots or voting 10machines. Any county board, board of county commissioners or 11board of election commissioners may contract for the 12tabulation of votes at a location outside its territorial 13jurisdiction when there is no suitable tabulating equipment 14available within its territorial jurisdiction. In no case may 15a county board, board of county commissioners or board of 16election commissioners contract or arrange for the purchase, 17lease or loan of an electronic Precinct Tabulation Optical 18Scan Technology voting system or Precinct Tabulation Optical 19Scan Technology voting system component without the approval 20of the State Board of Elections as provided by Section 24B-16. 21However, the county board and board of county commissioners of 22each county having a population of 40,000 or more, with 23respect to all elections for which the county board or the 24county clerk is charged with the duty of providing materials 25and supplies, and each board of election commissioners in a 26municipality having a population of 40,000 or more, with   HB0002- 6 -LRB104 03384 SPS 13406 b1respect to elections under its jurisdiction, must provide 2either Precinct Tabulation Optical Scan Technology voting 3systems approved for use by the State Board of Elections under 4this Article or voting systems under Article 24A or Article 24 5for each precinct for all such elections except as provided in 6Section 24-1.2. For purposes of this Section 24B-3, the term 7"population" does not include persons prohibited from voting 8by Section 3-5 of this Code.9    Before any such Precinct Tabulation Optical Scan 10Technology system is introduced, adopted or used in any 11precinct or territory at least 2 months public notice must be 12given before the date of the first election where the Precinct 13Tabulation Optical Scan Technology voting system is to be 14used. The election authority shall publish the notice at least 15once in one or more newspapers published within the county, or 16other jurisdiction, where the election is held. If there is no 17such newspaper, the notice shall be published in a newspaper 18published in the county and having a general circulation 19within such jurisdiction. The notice shall be substantially as 20follows:21    Notice is hereby given that on (give date), at (give place 22where election is held) in the county of ...., an election will 23be held for (give name of offices to be filled) at which a 24Precinct Tabulation Optical Scan Technology electronic voting 25system will be used.26    Dated at.... on (insert date).  HB0002- 7 -LRB104 03384 SPS 13406 b1    This notice referred to shall be given only at the first 2election at which the Precinct Tabulation Optical Scan 3Technology voting machines or Precinct Tabulation Optical Scan 4Technology voting systems are used.5(Source: P.A. 91-357, eff. 7-29-99.) 6    (10 ILCS 5/3-5 rep.)7    Section 10. The Election Code is amended by repealing 8Section 3-5. 9    Section 15. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 10changing Section 5-5-5 as follows: 11    (730 ILCS 5/5-5-5)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1005-5-5)12    Sec. 5-5-5. Loss and restoration of rights. 13    (a) Conviction and disposition shall not entail the loss 14by the defendant of any civil rights, except under this 15Section and Sections 29-6 and 29-10 of The Election Code, as 16now or hereafter amended.17    (b) A person convicted of a felony shall be ineligible to 18hold an office created by the Constitution of this State until 19the completion of his sentence.20    (b-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person 21convicted of a felony, bribery, perjury, or other infamous 22crime for an offense committed on or after the effective date 23of this amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly and   HB0002- 8 -LRB104 03384 SPS 13406 b1committed while he or she was serving as a public official in 2this State is ineligible to hold any local public office or any 3office created by the Constitution of this State unless the 4person's conviction is reversed, the person is again restored 5to such rights by the terms of a pardon for the offense, the 6person has received a restoration of rights by the Governor, 7or the person's rights are otherwise restored by law.8    (c) (Blank). A person sentenced to imprisonment shall lose 9his right to vote until released from imprisonment.10    (d) On completion of sentence of imprisonment or upon 11discharge from probation, conditional discharge or periodic 12imprisonment, or at any time thereafter, all license rights 13and privileges granted under the authority of this State which 14have been revoked or suspended because of conviction of an 15offense shall be restored unless the authority having 16jurisdiction of such license rights finds after investigation 17and hearing that restoration is not in the public interest. 18This paragraph (d) shall not apply to the suspension or 19revocation of a license to operate a motor vehicle under the 20Illinois Vehicle Code.21    (e) Upon a person's discharge from incarceration or 22parole, or upon a person's discharge from probation or at any 23time thereafter, the committing court may enter an order 24certifying that the sentence has been satisfactorily completed 25when the court believes it would assist in the rehabilitation 26of the person and be consistent with the public welfare. Such   HB0002- 9 -LRB104 03384 SPS 13406 b1order may be entered upon the motion of the defendant or the 2State or upon the court's own motion.3    (f) Upon entry of the order, the court shall issue to the 4person in whose favor the order has been entered a certificate 5stating that his behavior after conviction has warranted the 6issuance of the order.7    (g) This Section shall not affect the right of a defendant 8to collaterally attack his conviction or to rely on it in bar 9of subsequent proceedings for the same offense.10    (h) No application for any license specified in subsection 11(i) of this Section granted under the authority of this State 12shall be denied by reason of an eligible offender who has 13obtained a certificate of relief from disabilities, as defined 14in Article 5.5 of this Chapter, having been previously 15convicted of one or more criminal offenses, or by reason of a 16finding of lack of "good moral character" when the finding is 17based upon the fact that the applicant has previously been 18convicted of one or more criminal offenses, unless:19        (1) there is a direct relationship between one or more 20    of the previous criminal offenses and the specific license 21    sought; or22        (2) the issuance of the license would involve an 23    unreasonable risk to property or to the safety or welfare 24    of specific individuals or the general public.25    In making such a determination, the licensing agency shall 26consider the following factors:  HB0002- 10 -LRB104 03384 SPS 13406 b1        (1) the public policy of this State, as expressed in 2    Article 5.5 of this Chapter, to encourage the licensure 3    and employment of persons previously convicted of one or 4    more criminal offenses;5        (2) the specific duties and responsibilities 6    necessarily related to the license being sought;7        (3) the bearing, if any, the criminal offenses or 8    offenses for which the person was previously convicted 9    will have on his or her fitness or ability to perform one 10    or more such duties and responsibilities;11        (4) the time which has elapsed since the occurrence of 12    the criminal offense or offenses;13        (5) the age of the person at the time of occurrence of 14    the criminal offense or offenses;15        (6) the seriousness of the offense or offenses;16        (7) any information produced by the person or produced 17    on his or her behalf in regard to his or her rehabilitation 18    and good conduct, including a certificate of relief from 19    disabilities issued to the applicant, which certificate 20    shall create a presumption of rehabilitation in regard to 21    the offense or offenses specified in the certificate; and22        (8) the legitimate interest of the licensing agency in 23    protecting property, and the safety and welfare of 24    specific individuals or the general public.25    (i) A certificate of relief from disabilities shall be 26issued only for a license or certification issued under the   HB0002- 11 -LRB104 03384 SPS 13406 b1following Acts:2        (1) the Animal Welfare Act; except that a certificate 3    of relief from disabilities may not be granted to provide 4    for the issuance or restoration of a license under the 5    Animal Welfare Act for any person convicted of violating 6    Section 3, 3.01, 3.02, 3.03, 3.03-1, or 4.01 of the Humane 7    Care for Animals Act or Section 26-5 or 48-1 of the 8    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012;9        (2) the Illinois Athletic Trainers Practice Act;10        (3) the Barber, Cosmetology, Esthetics, Hair Braiding, 11    and Nail Technology Act of 1985;12        (4) the Boiler and Pressure Vessel Repairer Regulation 13    Act;14        (5) the Boxing and Full-contact Martial Arts Act;15        (6) the Illinois Certified Shorthand Reporters Act of 16    1984;17        (7) the Illinois Farm Labor Contractor Certification 18    Act;19        (8) the Registered Interior Designers Act;20        (9) the Illinois Professional Land Surveyor Act of 21    1989;22        (10) the Landscape Architecture Registration Act;23        (11) the Marriage and Family Therapy Licensing Act;24        (12) the Private Employment Agency Act;25        (13) the Professional Counselor and Clinical 26    Professional Counselor Licensing and Practice Act;  HB0002- 12 -LRB104 03384 SPS 13406 b1        (14) the Real Estate License Act of 2000;2        (15) the Illinois Roofing Industry Licensing Act;3        (16) the Professional Engineering Practice Act of 4    1989;5        (17) the Water Well and Pump Installation Contractor's 6    License Act;7        (18) the Electrologist Licensing Act; 8        (19) the Auction License Act;9        (20) the Illinois Architecture Practice Act of 1989;10        (21) the Dietitian Nutritionist Practice Act;11        (22) the Environmental Health Practitioner Licensing 12    Act;13        (23) the Funeral Directors and Embalmers Licensing 14    Code;15        (24) (blank);16        (25) the Professional Geologist Licensing Act;17        (26) the Illinois Public Accounting Act; and18        (27) the Structural Engineering Practice Act of 1989.19(Source: P.A. 102-284, eff. 8-6-21; 103-562, eff. 11-17-23.) 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 211, 2026.